District of Columbia statutes.
15-108

Interest on judgment for liquidated debt.

In an action in the United States District Court for the District of Columbia or the Superior Court of the District of Columbia to recover a liquidated debt on which interest is payable by contract or by law or usage the judgment for the plaintiff shall include interest on the principal debt from the time when it was due and payable, at the rate fixed by the contract, if any, until paid.

Aug. 30, 1964, 78 Stat. 677, Pub. L. 88-509, § 3(b)(1)
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 553, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 144(3)
1981 Ed., § 15-108.
1973 Ed., § 15-108.